Utah statutes.
41-6a-705.   Passing upon right -- When permissible.

(1)  The operator of a vehicle may overtake and pass on the right of another vehicle only:

(a)  when the vehicle overtaken is making or preparing to make a left turn; or

(b) on a roadway with unobstructed pavement of sufficient width for two or more lines of vehicles moving lawfully in the direction being traveled by the overtaking vehicle.

(2)  The operator of a vehicle may overtake and pass another vehicle on the right only under conditions permitting the movement with safety.  

(3)  The operator of a vehicle may not overtake and pass another vehicle if the movement is made by driving off the roadway.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

